en: Marine Electronics
xx: Marine Electronics
cs: Námořní elektronika
da: Marineelektronik
de: Elektrische Instrumente Seefahrt
es: Electrónuca náutica
fr: Appareils électroniques maritimes
it: Dispositivi elettronici nautici
ja: 航海計器
nl: Elektronica voor boten
no: Maritim elektronikk
pl: Elektronika morska
pt: Equipamentos eletrônicos de navegação
ru: Морская электроника
sv: Marinelektronik
tr: Deniz Elektronik Sistemleri

en: Fish Finders
xx: Fish Finders
cs: Vyhledávače ryb
da: Fiskesøgere
de: Fischfinder
es: Ecosondas
fr: Détecteurs de poissons
it: Ecoscandagli
ja: 魚群探知機
nl: Viszoekers
no: Fiskefinnere
pl: Sonary do lokalizacji ryb
pt: Fishfinders
ru: Рыболокаторы
sv: Fisksökare
tr: Balık Bulucular

en: Marine Audio & Video Receivers
xx: Marine Audio & Video Receivers
cs: Námořní AV technika
da: AV-modtagere til skibsbrug
de: Audio- und Videoemfpänger
es: Receptores náuticos de audio y vídeo
fr: Récepteurs audio et vidéo maritimes
it: Ricevitori audio e video nautici
ja: マリンAVレシーバー
nl: Audio- en video-ontvangers voor boten
no: Maritime lyd- og videomottakere
pl: Morskie odbiorniki obrazu i dźwięku
pt: Receptores marinhos de áudio e vídeo
ru: Судовые аудио- и видеоприемники
sv: Marinmottagare för ljud och bild
tr: Deniz Ses ve Görüntü Alıcıları

en: Marine Chartplotters & GPS
xx: Marine Chartplotters & GPS
cs: Námořní mapové navigace a GPS
da: Marinediagramplottere og GPS
de: Seekartenplotter & GPS
es: GPS y trazadores gráficos náuticos
fr: Traceurs et GPS maritimes
it: Chartplotter e GPS nautici
ja: GPSプロッター
nl: Kaartplotters en GPS voor boten
no: Maritime kartplottere og GPS
pl: Chartplottery i GPS-y morskie
pt: Chartplotters e GPS marinhos
ru: Морские картплоттеры и системы GPS
sv: Marina kartplottrar och GPS-enheter
tr: Tekne Harita Okuyucu ve GPS Sistemleri

en: Marine Radar
xx: Marine Radar
cs: Námořní radary
da: Marineradar
de: Schiffsradar
es: Radar náutico
fr: Radar de navigation maritime
it: Radar nautico
ja: 船舶レーダー
nl: Scheepsradar
no: Maritime radarer
pl: Radary morskie
pt: Radar marinho
ru: Судовые радары
sv: Marinradar
tr: Deniz Radarları

en: Marine Radios
xx: Marine Radios
cs: Námořní vysílačky
da: Marineradiorer
de: Seefunkgeräte
es: Radios náuticas
fr: Radios maritimes
it: Radio marine
ja: 船舶無線
nl: Scheepsradio's
no: Maritime radioer
pl: Radia morskie
pt: Rádios marinhos
ru: Морские радиомодули
sv: Marinradio
tr: Deniz Telsizleri

en: Marine Speakers
xx: Marine Speakers
cs: Námořní reproduktory
da: Højttalere til skibsbrug
de: Marine-Lautsprecher
es: Altavoces náuticos
fr: Haut-parleurs pour bateaux
it: Altoparlanti nautici
ja: マリンスピーカー
nl: Luidsprekers voor boten
no: Marinhøyttalere
pl: Głośniki morskie
pt: Alto-falantes marinhos
ru: Судовые громкоговорители
sv: Marinhögtalare
tr: Deniz Hoparlörleri

en: Networking
xx: Networking
cs: Sítě
da: Netværk
de: Netzwerktechnik
es: Redes
fr: Réseaux
it: Rete
ja: ネットワーク
nl: Netwerken
no: Nettverk
pl: Sieci
pt: Rede
ru: Сетевое оборудование
sv: Nätverk
tr: Ağ Sistemleri

en: Bridges & Routers
xx: Bridges & Routers
cs: Síťové mosty a routery
da: Broer og routere
de: Bridges & Router
es: Puentes y enrutadores
fr: Ponts et routeurs
it: Bridge e router
ja: ブリッジ・ルーター
nl: Bridges en routers
no: Broer og rutere
pl: Mostki i routery
pt: Pontes e roteadores
ru: Мосты и маршрутизаторы
sv: Bryggor och routrar
tr: Köprüler ve Yönlendiriciler

en: Network Bridges
xx: Network Bridges
cs: Síťové mosty
da: Netværksbroer
de: Netzwerk-Bridges
es: Puentes de red
fr: Ponts réseau
it: Bridge di rete
ja: ネットワークブリッジ
nl: Netwerkbridges
no: Nettverksbroer
pl: Mostki sieciowe
pt: Ponte de rede
ru: Сетевые мосты
sv: Nätverksbryggor
tr: Ağ Köprüleri

en: VoIP Gateways & Routers
xx: VoIP Gateways & Routers
cs: Směrovače a brány VoIP
da: VoIP-gateways og -routere
de: VoIP-Gateways & -Router
es: Enrutadores y puertas de enlace VoIP
fr: Ponts et routeurs VoIP
it: Gateway e router VoIP
ja: VoIPゲートウェイ・ルーター
nl: VoIP gateways en routers
no: VoIP-gatewayer og rutere
pl: Bramki i routery VoIP
pt: Gateways e roteadores para VoIP
ru: VoIP-шлюзы и маршрутизаторы
sv: VoIP-gateways och routers
tr: VoIP Ağ Geçitleri ve Yönlendiricileri

en: Wireless Access Points
xx: Wireless Access Points
cs: Bezdrátové přístupové body
da: Trådløse adgangspunkter
de: Wireless Access Points
es: Puntos de acceso inalámbrico
fr: Points d'accès Wi-Fi
it: WAP (Wireless Access Point)
ja: 無線アクセスポイント
nl: Draadloze toegangspunten
no: Trådløse tilgangspunkter
pl: Bezprzewodowe punkty dostępowe
pt: Pontos de acesso sem fio
ru: Точки беспроводного доступа
sv: Trådlösa åtkomstpunkter
tr: Kablosuz Erişim Noktaları

en: Wireless Routers
xx: Wireless Routers
cs: Bezdrátové routery
da: Trådløse routere
de: Wireless Router
es: Enrutadores inalámbricos
fr: Routeurs Wi-Fi
it: Router wireless
ja: 無線ルーター
nl: Draadloze routers
no: Trådløse rutere
pl: Routery bezprzewodowe
pt: Roteadores sem fio
ru: Беспроводные маршрутизаторы
sv: Trådlösa routrar
tr: Kablosuz Yönlendiriciler

en: Concentrators & Multiplexers
xx: Concentrators & Multiplexers
cs: Koncentrátory a multiplexory
da: Koncentratorer og multipleksere
de: Konzentratoren & Multiplexer
es: Concentradores y multiplexores
fr: Concentrateurs et multiplexeurs
it: Concentratori e multiplexer
ja: コンセントレータ・マルチプレクサ
nl: Concentrators en multiplexers
no: Konsentratorer og multipleksere
pl: Koncentratory i multipleksery
pt: Concentradores e multiplexadores
ru: Концентраторы и мультиплексоры
sv: Koncentrationer och multiplexrar
tr: Yoğunlaştırıcılar ve Çoklayıcılar

en: Hubs & Switches
xx: Hubs & Switches
cs: Rozbočovače a přepínače
da: Hubs og switches
de: Hubs & Schalter
es: Concentradores y conmutadores
fr: Hubs et commutateurs
it: Hub e switch
ja: ハブ・スイッチ
nl: Hubs en switches
no: Huber og svitsjer
pl: Huby i switche
pt: Hubs e interruptores
ru: Сетевые концентраторы и коммутаторы
sv: Hubbar och switchrar
tr: Hublar ve Anahtarlar

en: Modem Accessories
xx: Modem Accessories
cs: Modemy – příslušenství
da: Modem – tilbehør
de: Modemzubehör
es: Accesorios para módems
fr: Accessoires pour modems
it: Accessori modem
ja: モデム関連用品
nl: Modemaccessoires
no: Modem-tilbehør
pl: Akcesoria do modemów
pt: Acessórios para modem
ru: Принадлежности для модемов
sv: Modemtillbehör
tr: Modem Aksesuarları

en: Modems
xx: Modems
cs: Modemy
da: Modemmer
de: Modems
es: Módems
fr: Modems
it: Modem
ja: モデム
nl: Modems
no: Modem
pl: Modemy
pt: Modens
ru: Модемы
sv: Modem
tr: Modemler

en: Network Cards & Adapters
xx: Network Cards & Adapters
cs: Síťové karty a adaptéry
da: Netværkskort og -adaptere
de: Netzwerkkarten
es: Adaptadores y tarjetas de red
fr: Cartes réseau et adaptateurs
it: Schede e adattatori di rete
ja: ネットワークカード・アダプター
nl: Netwerkkaarten en -adapters
no: Nettverkskort og adaptere
pl: Karty i adaptery sieciowe
pt: Cartões de rede e adaptadores
ru: Сетевые карты и адаптеры
sv: Nätverkskort och adaptrar
tr: Ağ Kartları ve Adaptörleri

en: Network Security & Firewall Devices
xx: Network Security & Firewall Devices
cs: Zařízení pro zabezpečení sítě a firewally
da: Netværkssikkerhed og firewallenheder
de: Netzwerksicherheitssysteme & Firewalls
es: Dispositivos firewall y seguridad de red
fr: Pare-feu et appareils pour la sécurité des réseaux
it: Dispositivi protezione rete e firewall
ja: ネットワークセキュリティ・ファイアウォール
nl: Netwerkbeveiliging en firewallapparaten
no: Nettverkssikkerhet og brannmurer
pl: Sprzęt do bezpieczeństwa sieciowego i firewalle
pt: Segurança de rede e dispositivos firewall
ru: Устройства защиты сети и межсетевые экраны
sv: Nätverkssäkerhet och brandväggsenheter
tr: Ağ Güvenliği ve Güvenlik Duvarı Cihazları

en: Power Over Ethernet Adapters
xx: Power Over Ethernet Adapters
cs: Napájecí zdroje a rozbočovače
da: Strømfødere og -fordelere
de: PoE-Adapter
es: Adaptadores de Power over Ethernet
fr: Adaptateurs PoE
it: Adattatori PoE
ja: パワーインジェクタ・スプリッタ
nl: Stroominjectoren en -splitters
no: PoE-adaptere
pl: Zasilacze typu power injector i power splitter
pt: Injetores e divisores de energia
ru: Инжекторы и разветвители питания
sv: Ströminjektorer och strömdelare
tr: Ethernet Üzerinden Güç Adaptörleri